Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 1
LONG-RANGE HIGHWAY PROGRAM

43-4-101 to 43-4-113. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 96:

Entire part repealed, p. 467, § 12, effective April 23.

Editor's note:

This part 1 was numbered as article 7 of chapter 120, C.R.S. 1963. For amendments to this part 1 prior to its repeal in 1996, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.